Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 26. Department of Workforce Services

Editor's notes. —

Both Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 1, and Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 1, enacted an article 26 in chapter 2 of this title. The provisions enacted by ch. 81, § 1, have been redesignated as article 27 (§§

9-2-2701

through

9-2-2707

.)

§ 9-2-2601.
Department of workforce services; duties and responsibilities; agreements with other agencies authorized; definition; merger with department of employment.

The department of workforce services is created. The department is the authority for workforce services. The department is the successor agency for public employment and training services which previously existed under the department of employment. The department shall perform all functions previously performed by those programs.

The department may submit a plan for the state to the appropriate federal agencies for work activities and programs as authorized under section 102 of the act of congress approved July 22, 2014 entitled “Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act”, P.L. 113-128, 29 U.S.C. 3112 or subsequent similar enactments.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act to implement requirements of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or subsequent similar enactments. When adopting such rules and regulations the department shall use language which focuses on the importance of a person, rather than a person’s disability.

The department shall administer expenditures from the workforce development training fund as provided in W.S.

9-2-2604

. The department shall administer expenditures from the Wyoming workforce development-priority economic sector partnership subaccount within the economic diversification account as provided in W.S.

9-2-2609

through

9-2-2611

and

9-12-1404

.

The department is the designated agency for the state under 29 U.S.C. § 49 et seq. and shall:

Comply with the requirements of and secure benefits for the state under 29 U.S.C. § 49 et seq.;

Establish and maintain public employment offices throughout the state; and

Cooperate with federal agencies under 29 U.S.C. § 49 et seq.

The department may cooperate and enter into agreements with the railroad retirement board, any other federal or state agency or any private nonprofit organization for the provision of public employment offices and services and may accept contributions for this purpose.

The department shall take appropriate steps to:

Reduce and prevent unemployment and provide supportive services that are necessary to assist individuals to take part in activities leading to self-sufficiency;

Encourage and assist in the adoption of practical methods of vocational training, retraining and guidance;

Investigate, recommend, advise and assist in the establishment and operation of public works reserves by the state and its political subdivisions to be used in times of business depression and unemployment;

Promote alternative reemployment of unemployed workers throughout the state;

Conduct and publish results of investigations and research studies;

Assist the Wyoming workforce development council and the state youth council in pursuing their missions and goals; and

Administer contracts pursuant to W.S.

9-2-2608

and

9-2-2609

through

9-2-2611

.

In any civil action to enforce this act, the department may be represented by the attorney general at the request of the department.

As used in this article unless the context requires otherwise, “department” means the department of workforce services.

On or before July 1, 2011, the department of workforce services shall include all divisions, programs and functions previously assigned to the department of employment created by W.S.

9-2-2002

.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 2; 2008, ch. 70, § 1; ch. 116, §
1; 2011, ch. 49, § 1; 2012, ch. 55, § 2; 2016 ch. 40, § 1, effective March 4, 2016; 2018 ch. 128, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

Federal Workforce Investment Act. —

The federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998 is codified at 29 USCS § 2801 et seq.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Wyoming Public Assistance and Social Services Act. —

See §

42-2-201

et seq.

The 2008 amendments.

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 70, §
1, added the second sentence of (c).

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 116, § 1, made stylistic changes.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2011 amendment,

added (k).

Laws 2011, ch. 49 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2011.

The 2012 amendment,

added (g)(vii) and made related changes.

Laws 2012, ch. 55 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (b), added “unified” following “may submit” and substituted “section 102 of the act of congress approved July 22, 2014 entitled "Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act", P.L. 113-128,
29 U.S.C. 3112 or subsequent similar enactments” for “section 501 of the Workforce Investment Act of 1998”; and substituted “Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or subsequent similar enactments” for “Workforce Investment Act” in (c).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018,
in (d), added the second sentence; and in (g)(vii), added “and

9-2-2609

through

9-2-2611

.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-2-2602.
Director of department; appointment; removal; duties.

With the advice and consent of the senate the governor shall appoint a director for the department who shall serve under the direction of the governor and who may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. Appointments and terms under this section shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

The director shall:

Disburse and administer all federal funds or other monies allotted to the department;

Prescribe by rule, order or regulation the conditions under which these monies shall be disbursed and administered. Any audit performed shall comply with the requirements of W.S.

9-1-507

;

Enter into agreements, not inconsistent with the laws of the state, required as conditions precedent to receiving funds or other assistance. Funds appropriated by the legislature for operation of the department shall be used for the specified purposes only, and the director, in accepting funds from any other source, shall not consent to impairment of the department’s statutory responsibilities;

Hold hearings, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses and take testimony as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act in all matters relating to the exercise and performance of the powers and duties vested in the department;

With the assistance of the attorney general bring actions in the courts of the state in the name of the department;

Promulgate reasonable rules and regulations in compliance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Appoint a separate administrator for each of the divisions of the department of workforce services and may discharge the administrators as provided in W.S. 9-2-1706(c)(ii); and

Provide information and guidance to employers and employees regarding workplace injuries as specified under this paragraph. The director shall widely disseminate information about the resources available to employers and employees under this paragraph and shall provide information and guidance regarding:

The rights and responsibilities of employers and employees under the law;

The administrative processes available for resolving workers’ compensation claims when an employer and employee are subject to the Worker’s Compensation Act;

The completion of forms required under any applicable administrative process;

Available local, state and federal financial assistance, rehabilitation and work placement programs, as well as other social services that the director considers appropriate; and

Available liability insurance or industrial insurance providers offering coverage for self-insured employers.

In order that there may be established and maintained in the state of Wyoming a system of public employment offices, in conformity with an act of congress approved June 6, 1933, providing for the establishment of a national employment system and for cooperation with the states of the promotion of the system and for other purposes, the state of Wyoming accepts the provisions of the act of congress and designates the director of the department of workforce services as its agent in whom is vested all powers necessary to cooperate with the United States department of labor in the establishment and maintenance in Wyoming of a system of employment offices under the control of the United States secretary of labor and to do all things which are necessary under the federal act to obtain the benefits which are available to the state under the provisions of the federal act.

Not later than October 2 of each year, the department shall include information regarding optional employers and their classifications in the report required under W.S. 27-14-201(c).

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 2; 2022 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, deleted “and” at the end of (b)(vi); added “and” at the end of (b)(vii); added (b)(viii); added (d); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

The act of congress approved June 6, 1933 is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 49 et seq.

§ 9-2-2603.
[Vetoed.]

Vetoed by Governor March 25, 2002.

§ 9-2-2604.
Workforce development training fund established.

There is established the Wyoming workforce development training fund. The state treasurer shall invest available revenues in the fund in accordance with law, and earnings from those investments shall be credited to the fund. The revenues in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department of workforce services to be expended as provided in this section.

Revenues in the Wyoming workforce development training fund may be expended for the following:

For all administrative costs incurred by:

The department of workforce services associated with establishing, assessing, collecting and maintaining the state unemployment insurance trust fund and assessing and collecting the Wyoming workforce development training fund; and

The department of workforce services associated with maintaining the Wyoming workforce development training fund.

To fund workforce development programs in the department of workforce services with the approval of the governor;

To provide workforce development programs designed to train, retrain or upgrade work skills for existing Wyoming workers; and

To provide training for skills necessary for specific economic development initiatives.

Expenditures from the workforce development training fund for purposes authorized in subsection (b) of this section shall be approved by the director of the department of workforce services based on procedures, criteria and performance measures established by regulations. Notification of expenditures approved under paragraphs (b)(iii) and (iv) of this section and a copy of the training fund application shall be provided to the Wyoming business council. The director of the department of workforce services shall report annually to the governor and the legislature on the expenditures made from the training fund in the preceding fiscal year and the results of the activities funded by the training fund.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 2; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (b)(i)(A).

§ 9-2-2605.
Sale of office publications; exception.

The department of workforce services may sell any publication or other duplicated or printed material, other than the biennial report, which it prepares and which the public may desire to purchase.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 2.

§ 9-2-2606.
Sale of office publications; limitation on charges.

The charges made by the department of workforce services for publications or other duplicated or printed materials, other than the biennial report, which it prepares shall not exceed the cost of materials, printing, duplication, packaging and postage.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 2.

§ 9-2-2607.
Confidentiality of information; disclosure; reimbursement.

Except as otherwise provided, information maintained pursuant to this article shall not be disclosed in a manner which reveals the identity of the employing unit or the individual. The confidentiality limitations of this section do not apply to transfers of information to the employing unit or the individual when the employing unit or individual who provided the requested information gives written permission for its release, or between the divisions of the department of workforce services so long as the transfer of information is not restricted by federal law, rule or contract. Any employee of the requesting department or agency who discloses information outside of the department in violation of federal or state law may be terminated without progressive discipline.

The department may, upon request, disclose any information obtained under this article to a director or agency head, or his designee or agent, in the executive branch of federal or state government to be used by the public official only for official business in connection with the administration of a law or in the enforcement of a law by that public official. The requesting agency shall reimburse the department for the cost of furnishing this information unless the cost is insignificant. Any employee of the requesting department or agency who discloses information outside of the department in violation of federal or state law may be terminated without progressive discipline.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 2; 2010, ch. 65, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), inserted “to the employing unit or the individual when the employing unit or individual who provided the requested information gives written permission for its release, or.”

§ 9-2-2608.
Workplace safety contract program.

The department of workforce services shall administer a program of workplace safety contracts as provided in this section.

Upon application from a public or private employer, the department may contract with an employer to take specific actions to increase and provide for effective participation in workplace safety programs created and administered under title 27, chapter 11 or 14 of Wyoming statutes. Contract recipients under this section shall:

Document the number of employees covered under the workplace safety programs created or enhanced by the contract;

Document decreases in occupational hazards accomplished through participation in the workplace safety programs.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations for administration of the contract program provided in this section. Contracts under this section shall be conditioned on the following:

The recipient of the contract initiating or participating in a workplace safety program created and administered under title 27, chapter 11 or 14 of Wyoming statutes;

An in-cash cost sharing contribution of at least ten percent (10%) from the employer;

No contract under this program shall be made to any individual employer in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00);

Funds expended on contracts under this section shall be used solely for enhancement or implementation of workplace safety programs, including for assistance in the purchase of safety equipment necessary to carry out the programs created and administered under title 27, chapter 11 or 14 of Wyoming statutes.

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 29 § 2.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 55, § 1; 2018 ch. 29, § 2, effective March 9, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

repealed former (d).

Laws 2018, ch. 29, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 55, § 1, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 9-2-2609.
Purpose.

The Wyoming Workforce Development-Priority Economic Sector Partnership Act is created to meet the training needs of existing businesses in the state and to provide incentives to businesses to locate and expand within the state through government assisted new jobs training.

It is the intent of the legislature to provide training funds to train and educate employees, which will result in the production of high wage and high skilled jobs that will increase the earning potential and employment opportunities for Wyoming employees and enhance and diversify the state’s economy.

History.

2018 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 128, § 6(b), makes the act effective July 1, 2018.

§ 9-2-2610.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Applicant” means an employer seeking funding under this act;

“Business entity” means a corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership or other legal entity;

“Department” means the department of workforce services created in W.S.

9-2-2018

;

“ENDOW council” means the economically needed diversity options for Wyoming executive council;

“Eligible training provider” means:

The University of Wyoming;

A Wyoming community college district;

An entity operated by a tribal government of either the Northern Arapaho or Eastern Shoshone tribes on the Wind River Indian Reservation;

An entity approved to provide workforce training that is included on the eligible training provider list.

“Eligible training provider list” means the list maintained by the department of those eligible training providers who may be used to provide workforce training under this act;

“Employee” means an individual employed in a new job;

“Employer” means an individual or business entity providing new jobs and entering into a contract under this act;

“Full-time job” means a predominantly year-round position requiring an average of at least thirty-five (35) hours of work each week;

“New job” means a newly created full-time or part-time job in a priority economic sector business. The term does not include:

Jobs for recalled employees returning to positions held previously, for replacement employees, or for employees newly hired as a result of a labor dispute, seasonal jobs, or other jobs that previously existed within the employment of the employer in the state; or

Jobs created by an employer as the result of an acquisition of a Wyoming entity if those jobs previously existed in the state of Wyoming in the acquired company or entity unless it is demonstrated that the jobs:

Are substantially different as a result of the acquisition; and

Will require new training for the employee to meet new job requirements.

“Part-time job” means a predominantly year-round position requiring an average of twenty-five (25) to thirty-four (34) hours of work each week;

“Priority economic sector business” means an employer engaged in establishing or expanding operations within a priority economic sector identified in the twenty (20) year comprehensive economic diversification strategy approved by the governor pursuant to W.S.

9-12-1402

in Wyoming that through the employment of knowledge or labor add value to a product, process or export service that results in the creation of new wealth;

“Program” means a workforce training program implemented in accordance with the provisions of this act;

“Program costs” means all necessary and incidental costs of providing program services. The term does not include the cost of equipment to be owned or used by the eligible training provider beyond the term of the contract with the department unless the eligible training provider is an entity specified in subparagraphs (v)(A) through (C) of this subsection and the department determines the equipment likely will be used to provide subsequent training in a priority economic sector program under this act or other program funded by the department;

“Program services” means training and education specifically directed to the new jobs, including:

All direct training costs, such as:

Program promotion;

Instructor wages, per diem and travel;

Curriculum development and training materials;

Lease of training equipment and training space;

Purchase of training equipment subject to the limitations provided in paragraph (xiv) of this subsection;

Miscellaneous direct training costs;

Administrative costs; and

Assessment and testing.

In-house or on-the-job training; and

Subcontracted services with eligible training providers.

“Wyoming workforce development-priority economic sector partnership subaccount” or “subaccount” means the subaccount created in W.S. 9-12-1404(a)(iii);

“Wyoming workforce development-priority economic sector partnership program” means the workforce training program authorized by this act;

“This act” means W.S.

9-2-2609

through

9-2-2611

.

History.

2018 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2019 ch. 186, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 128, § 6(b), makes the act effective July 1, 2018.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(xvi), substituted "W.S. 9-12-1404(a)(iii)" for "W.S. 9-12-1404(a)(i)."

§ 9-2-2611.
Priority economic sector business workforce training programs; eligibility.

The department, in consultation with the coordinator of economic diversification shall administer the Wyoming workforce development-priority economic sector partnership program. Using available monies within the Wyoming workforce development–priority economic sector partnership subaccount, the department may contract to provide training funds for education or skills based training for employees for priority economic sector businesses in new jobs. The funds shall be provided to eligible training providers in accordance with contracts between the department, priority economic sector business employers and eligible training providers, for the purpose of providing employees with education and training required for jobs in new or expanding priority economic sector businesses in the state.

To be eligible for funding under the Wyoming employer-workforce partnership program, an applicant shall demonstrate that it is a priority economic sector business.

An applicant shall provide a match of at least one dollar ($1.00) for every one dollar ($1.00) requested from the subaccount. The match may include new loans and investments and expenditures for direct project related costs such as new equipment and buildings. The department may consider recent purchases of fixed assets directly related to the proposal on a case-by-case basis. A purchase of fixed assets directly related to the proposed training activities that have been made within ninety (90) days after submission of the application may be considered eligible by the department.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, funding provided under this section may not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for each full-time position and two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) for each part-time position for which an employee is being trained. Funding may be provided only for a new job that has an average weekly wage that meets or exceeds the current average weekly wage of the county in which the employees are to be principally employed, provided minimum wage requirements are met. The department may consider the value of employee benefits in calculating the expected annual wage.

The department may, in exceptional circumstances, consider a higher funding ceiling for jobs that will pay high wages and benefits if the need for higher training costs is documented in the application.

Funding under this section shall be proportional to the number of jobs provided, the expected average annual wage of all jobs provided, and the underlying economic indicators of the region where the majority of the jobs will be created.

Funding ceilings shall be determined by the availability of funding, the cost for each job and the quality of the priority economic sector business proposal.

The funding application, at a minimum, shall contain:

A business plan containing information that is sufficient for the department to obtain an adequate understanding of the business to be assisted, including the products or services offered, estimated market potential, management experience of principals, current financial position, and details of the proposed venture. In lieu of a business plan, the department may consider a copy of the current loan application to entities such as the federal business and industry guarantee program or the small business administration;

Financial statements and projections for the two (2) most recent years of operation and projections for each of the two (2) years following the distribution of funds, including but not limited to balance sheets, profit and loss statements, and cash flow statements. A business operating for less than two (2) years shall provide all available financial statements. Information provided under this paragraph shall be considered confidential and not subject to inspection as provided by W.S. 16-4-203(a)(i);

A hiring and training plan, which shall include:

A breakdown of the jobs to be created or retained, including the number and type of jobs that are full-time, part-time, skilled, semiskilled or unskilled positions;

A timetable for creating the positions and the total number of employees to be hired;

An assurance that the business will comply with equal opportunity and nondiscrimination laws;

Procedures for outreach, recruitment, screening, training and placement of employees;

A description of the training curriculum and resources;

Written commitments from any agency or organization participating in the implementation of the hiring plan; and

A description of the type and method of training to be provided to employees, the starting wage and wages to be paid after training for each position, the job benefits to be paid or provided, and any payment to eligible training providers.

A contract under this act shall contain provisions:

Certifying that the amount of the funding already expended, together with interest at a rate of four percent (4%) per annum compounded annually from the date the matching funds were provided, will be reimbursed in the event that the priority economic sector business ceases operation in the state of Wyoming within the funding contract period, which may be up to two (2) years;

Specifying that funding will be provided over the contract period only upon the department verifying the creation of eligible jobs, the hiring of employees for the jobs or the incurring of eligible training expenses; and

Providing the department with annual reports and a final closeout report that documents the wages paid to an employee upon completion of the training.

The contract shall be signed by the person in the priority economic sector business who is assigned the duties and responsibilities for training and the overall success of the program and by the business’s chief executive.

The Wyoming business council shall assist the department with review of information provided under paragraphs (h)(i) and (ii) of this section, as requested by the department. If the department determines that an applicant meets the criteria established in this section and has complied with the applicable procedures and review processes established by the department, the department may recommend funding for a priority economic sector business workforce development program and the disbursement of funds under contract to the eligible training provider. The recipient eligible training provider shall use funds received under the program in accordance with the provisions of the contract. No funding shall be provided for any program without the written opinion of the attorney general certifying the legality of the transaction and all documents connected therein. Upon recommendation of the department, certification by the attorney general, and approval by the governor or his designee, funding from the Wyoming workforce development-priority economic sector partnership subaccount may be distributed to the eligible training provider.

The department shall provide employers assistance in accessing workforce and education services outside the scope of this act for which employees may be eligible. These additional services shall not be used to replace funding provided under this act after the contract has been finalized.

The department shall:

Adopt rules to implement this act. At minimum the rules shall establish application procedures, requirements and qualifications for funding under this act. The rules may include provisions for agreements as the department determines consistent with this act and appropriate or necessary to ensure adequate consideration is provided to the state for funding under this act;

Report annually to the joint appropriations committee on the expenditures made from the Wyoming workforce development-priority economic sector partnership subaccount in the preceding fiscal year and the results of each partnership project’s activities.

History.

2018 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 128, § 6(b), makes the act effective July 1, 2018.